Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.40.106

Trafficking—Condition of sentence restricting contact—No-contact orders—Entry of order into computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

(1) If a defendant is found guilty of the crime of trafficking under RCW 9A.40.100 and a condition of the sentence restricts the defendant's ability to have contact with the victim, the condition must be recorded and a written certified copy of that order must be provided to the victim by the clerk of the court. Willful violation of a court order issued under this section is punishable under *RCW 26.50.110. The written order must contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend: Violation of this order is a criminal offense under *chapter 26.50 RCW and the violator is subject to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting, or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony.

(2) Whenever a no-contact order is issued under this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order, the law enforcement agency shall enter the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

[ 2017 c 230 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 26.50 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2021 c 215 s 170, effective July 1, 2022.